apertium-brx.brx.lexd
################################################
## Morphological Transducer for Bodo language ##
################################################

PATTERNS
NounRoot [ <n>: ] Number? Cases? Particle?
Pronoun Cases? Particle?
VerbRoot [ <v>: ] Aspects? Tenses? AdverbialSuffix? Particle?
Conjunction
AdverbRoot [ <adv>: ] Particle?
AdjectiveRoot [ <adj>: ] Number? Cases? Particle?
PostPosition

LEXICON NounRoot
गामि  # "village"
मुं   # "name"
मैदेर # "elephant"
जायगा # "place"
आइ # "mother"
दाउ # "bird" 
हा # "land"
अन # "rice powder"
अर # "fire"
ख’ # "place where hen lays egg"
गं # "horn"
सु # "thorn"
बार # "wind"
दै # "water"
सैमा # "dog"
बिजाब # "book"    
फुंखा # "source"
दावहा # "war"
थाग्रा # "place"
हादाब # "containing land"
दैमा # "river"
मोदाइ # "deity/god"
बरम # "disease"
सल' # "story"
अखा # "rain"
सावथाल # "group of people belonging to santal community"
अखाफोर # "moon"
दालान # "big building or hallway"
दालां # "bridge"
न’ # "house"
माइरं # "uncooked rice or not prepared rice"
गम # "wheat"
इन्जुर # "wall"
गराइ # "horse"
गाब # "colour"
लैथो # "sea"
बाबु # "brother"
बिगोमा # "owner"
अन्थाइ # "stone"
खथा # "paper notebook"
साल # "sal tree"
थामजि # "numeral: thirty"
मोसौ # "cow"
बोरमा # "goat"
मन्दिर # "temple: loan word"
लामा # "road"
एत'वा # "person name"
बिबौ # "person name"
अदेबा # "person name"
बिफां # "tree"
सोरखार # "government"
इंराज # "british rule government"
मंगला # "person name"
सिलाइ # "gun"
गुलि # "bullet"
बिलाय # "page" # Check for spelling issue later
बिलाइ # "leaf"
हाग्रा # "grass"
हाग्रामा # "forest"
जुनाद # "classifer of animals"
मोसा # "tiger"
बिमा # "mother"
फिथाइ # "fruit"
बन # "wood"
सेसा # "rabbit"
मोदै # "porcupine"
दाव # "bird" # Check for spelling issue later
फराइसा # "student"
दाइन # "numeral: eight"
सानाथ्रि # "soldier"
दौरि # "priest"
निजोरा # "water fall"
मैसो # "buffalo"
अख्रां # "sky"
फोरोंगिरि # "teacher"
फराइसालि # "school"
बोरलाधिर # "archer"
आबौ # "grandfather"
सालगेरिया # "person name"
दाना # "food for animals"
आरज # "prayer"
आइन # "law"
जेननाय # "to lost"
सावनाय # "brunt"
मासे #  "number one"
मोनसे # "number one"
सारि # "sari cloth"
बाथ्रा # "talk"
सोंथि # 
बोसोर # "year"
हानजासे # 
मुन्द्रा # 
बोलो # "strength"
बिरसा # "person name"
मुन्दा #

LEXICON Number
फोर<pl>:फोर # Plural 
मोन<pl>:मोन # Plural
सोर<pl>:सोर # Plural

फोर<pl>ा<nom>:फ्रा # Plural

सालि<pl>

LEXICON Cases
या<nom>:या # Nominative
ा<nom>:ा # Nominative
यो<nom>:यो # Nominative

खौ<acc>:खौ # Accusative
जों<ins>:जों # Instrumental or Instructive
नो<dat>:नो # Dative
फ्राय<abl>:फ्राय # Ablative

नि<gen>:नि # Genitive
हा<gen>:हा # Genitive

आव<loc>:आव # Locative # Spelling changes here need to check again
याव<loc>:याव # Locative
वाव<loc>:वाव # Locative

निथिं<all>:निथिं # Allative
थिं<all>:थिं # Allative

सिम<ill>:सिम # Illative

LEXICON Pronoun
आं<pers><p1><sg>:आं # "1st person - singular - i"
जों<pers><p1><pl>:जों # "1st person - plural - we"

नों<pers><p2><sg>:नों # "2nd person - singular - you"
नोंथों<pers><p2><sg>:नोंथों # "2nd person - singular - you (honour)"

नोंसोर<pers><p2><pl>:नोंसोर # "2nd person - plural - you"
नोंथोंमान<pers><p2><pl>:नोंथोंमान # "2nd person - plural - you (honour)"

बि<prx><p3><sg>:बि # "he/she - proximate"
बे<prx><p3><sg>:बे # "Can be proxminate and demonstrative"
बै<dst><p3><sg>:बै  # "he/she/it"
बिथों<pers><p3><sg>:बिथों # "he/she (honour)"

बिसोर<prx><p3><pl>:बिसोर # "they"
बेफोर<prx><p3><pl>:बेफोर # "they"
बैसोर<dst><p3><pl>:बैसोर # "they - distant"
बैफोर<dst><p3><pl>:बैफोर  # "they - distant"
बिथोंमान<pers><p3><pl>:बिथोंमान # "they (honour)"

रावबो<ind>:रावबो
सोरबा<ind>:सोरबा
बहाबा<ind>:बहाबा
बबेयावबा<ind>:बबेयावबा

गासै<ind>:गासै
नोम्फा<pers>:नोम्फा # (Derived noun prenomail prefix)
गाव<ref>:गाव # Reflexive pronoun

LEXICON Conjunction
आरो<cnjcoo>:आरो # "Co-ordinating conjunction - and"
एबा<cnjcoo>:एबा # "Co-ordinating conjunction - or"
नाथाय<cnjcoo>:नाथाय # "Co-ordinating conjunction - but"

मानोना<cnjsub>:मानोना # "Sub-ordinating conjunction - because"

LEXICON VerbRoot
बुं # "say"
दं # "is there"
फै # "come"
नु # "see"
लु # "make"
खा # "pluck"
दा # "weave"
जा # "eat"
था # "stay"
थाबाय # "walk"
हो # "give"
लां # "take away"
गसं # "stand"
दोन # "keep"
होन # "tell"
बार # "jump"
ला # "take"
लाखि # "keep"
खार # "run"
लिर # "write"
हा # "done"
मिनि # "smile"
खोमा # "to lose"
सिबि # ""
मोसा # "dance"
सफै # "to arrive"
साव # "to burn"
गाब # "cry"
रंजा # "to enjoy"
गाबजि # "to call out"
गाखो # "climb"
फराइ # "read"
खालाम # "do"
फोजोब # "to finish"
देरहा # "win"
गाव # "to shoot"
फराय # "study" # need to check spelling with फराइ
थाबाय # "walk"
बारलां # "jump away" # lang may be distal
मोसाफा # "dance"
बुजि # "to understand"
मोना # "to not get"
नागार # "search"
जादों # "happened"
नाजाव # "hold"
गावहर # "shoot"
लुनाय # "been build"
मोन # 
दोनथुम # "keep hold"
खाग्रा # "plugger"
दुमथे # 
खोना # "to hear"
आवगाय # "go forward"
गाबज्रि  #
नेनाय  #
सोलाय # 
थांजोब #
हेंथा   #
होआ #
सों #
सान # "to think / count"
बारग #
नां   #
नागारबो #
खारखोमा #
दानस्रांग्रा #
थाफै #
नायखां #
बाहाय #
गार #
थावरि #
नाजाव #

LEXICON Tenses
मोन<past>:मोन # "Past Tense"
गोन<fut>:गोन # "Future Tense"
गौ<fut>:गौ # "Future Tense"

लिया<neg>:लिया # Negative Tense
ला<neg>:ला # Negative Tense - short form of above

LEXICON Aspects
नो<inf>:नो # "Non-finite" # Inf stands of infinitiveness in list of symbol doc # not sure if correct pos to keep it here.

ो<hab>:ो # "Habitual aspects"
यो<hab>:यो # "Habitual aspects"
वो<hab>:वो # "Habitual aspects"

गासिनो<prog>:गासिनो # "Progressive aspects"
बाय<prog>:बाय # "Progressive aspects"

दों<perf>:दों # "Perfective aspect"
बाय<prf>:बाय # "Perfect aspect" # prf symbol not present in list of symbol

खै<prf><neg>:खै # "Negative perfect aspect"
खो<prf><itg>:खो # "Interrogative perfect aspect"


# https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Grammatical_particle
LEXICON Particle
ना<prt>:ना # "Conjunctive Particle" # prt symbol not present in list of symbol
नानै<prt>:नानै # "Conjunctive Particle"

नो<emp>:नो # "Emphatic particle"
हाय<emp>:हाय # "Emphatic particle"
सो<emp>:सो # "Emphatic particle"
बो<emp>:बो # "Emphatic particle"
दि<emp>:दि # "Emphatic particle"

बो<emp>:बो # "Inclusive particle"

ना<conf>:ना  # "Confirmative Particle"
दा<conf>:दा  # "Confirmative Particle"
थो<conf>:थो  # "Confirmative Particle"

LEXICON AdverbialSuffix
बाव<gna>:बाव  # Adverisal suffix for verb meaning again # adverb like in the document

LEXICON AdverbRoot
जेब्ला # "when/if"
मानो #  
माब्ला #
बेबादि # "like that"
माब्रै  # 

LEXICON AdjectiveRoot
मुंदांखा # "famous"
दासिम # "till now"
गुबुन # "others"
थोंगोर # "go ahead"
बांद्राय # "a lot"
एसेबां # "little bit more"
गोहो #  "strength or ability"
रोङा # "root "
बेरेखा # 
बेसेबां # 

LEXICON PostPosition
थाखाय<post>:थाखाय
